Missouri, session 2026, SB1223.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapter 196, RSMo, is amended by adding thereto
three new sections, to be known as sections 196.1400, 196.1405,
and 196.1410, to read as follows:
196.1400. 1. For purposes of this section, the
following terms mean:
(1) "Cosmetic", the same meaning given to the term in
section 196.010, except that the term "cosmetic" shall
include soap;
(2) "Food", the same meaning given to the term in
section 196.010;
(3) "Gene therapy product", any product with any
capacity to alter, interfere with, or otherwise act in any
manner similar or equivalent to genes;
(4) "Product", any product that is:
(a) A food, cosmetic, or other substance intended to
be ingested, introduced into, or applied to the human body
or intended to induce physiological effects; and
(b) Made available for sale in this state to the
general public at retail.

SB 1223 2
2. Any product that has been created to act as, or
exposed to processes that could result in the product
potentially acting as, a gene therapy or that could
otherwise possibly impact, alter, or introduce genetic
material or a genetic change into the user of the product,
individuals exposed to the product, or individuals exposed
to others who have used the product shall be conspicuously
labeled with the words "Potential Gene Therapy Product"
unless the product is known to be a gene therapy product.
Reasonable steps shall be taken to ensure the potential
purchaser or user of the product is made aware of the
presence of this label.
3. If a product is known to be a gene therapy product,
the product shall be conspicuously labeled with the words
"Gene Therapy Product".
4. The provisions of this section shall be liberally
construed in favor of disclosure of any potential gene
therapy product.
196.1405. 1. For purposes of this section, the
following terms mean:
(1) "Expose", transmit to another through skin-to-skin
contact, sexual activity, droplets or aerosols suspended in
the air, introduction into the blood supply or food supply,
or any other means;
(2) "Genetically modified", the alteration of genetic
material through modern biotechnology, directed evolution,
or any other mechanism in a way that does not occur
naturally or that does not occur at its natural rate.
2. Upon the written request of any resident of this
state, any entity that produces, sells, or distributes a
product in this state with the capacity to infect an
individual with a disease or to expose an individual to

SB 1223 3
genetically modified material, including, but not limited
to, vaccines, gene therapies, drugs, and medical
interventions, shall provide any and all information related
to the ways in which individuals who did not directly obtain
or use such product may be exposed to the product or a
component of the product. Any product manufacturer,
government agency, or organization of any type that has an
interest in the production, sale, or distribution of such
product shall be subject to the disclosure requirement of
this section and shall provide all relevant reports,
research, and knowledge upon request under this section.
3. Any entity described in subsection 2 of this
section shall provide the information requested under
subsection 2 of this section as soon as reasonably
practicable, but at least within twenty-one days, after
receipt of the written request to the resident who made the
request.
196.1410. Any entity that makes a product available in
this state that could infect, transmit to, or be absorbed in
any individual in any way that would act as a medical
intervention, vaccine, drug, or genetic modification shall
obtain fully informed consent from all individuals who could
be exposed to such product before exposure could occur.
Fully informed consent requires, at a minimum, that an
individual is made aware of all benefits and risks,
including side effects of the product, any adverse events of
special interest, and any other reasonably possible impacts
of the product.
✓